Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.04.067

Filing officer.

"Filing officer" means the county or state officer with whom declarations of candidacy for an office are required to be filed under this title.

[ 2003 c 111 s 112. Prior: 1990 c 59 s 77. Formerly RCW 29.01.068.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—1990 c 59: See notes following RCW 29A.04.013.